Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.762

Urban emergency medical service districts—Creation authorized in city or town with territory in two counties.

The council of a city or town that has territory included in two counties may adopt an ordinance creating an urban emergency medical service district in all of the portion of the city or town that is located in one of the two counties if: (1) The county in which the urban emergency medical service district is located does not impose an emergency medical service levy authorized under RCW 84.52.069; and (2) the other county in which the city or town is located does impose an emergency medical service levy authorized under RCW 84.52.069. The ordinance creating the district may only be adopted after a public hearing has been held on the creation of the district and the council makes a finding that it is in the public interest to create the district. The members of the city or town council, acting in an ex officio capacity and independently, shall compose the governing body of the urban emergency medical service district. The voters of an urban emergency medical service district shall be all registered voters residing within the urban emergency medical service district.

An urban emergency medical service district shall be a quasi-municipal corporation and an independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution. Urban emergency medical service districts shall also be "taxing districts" within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.

An urban emergency medical service district shall have the authority to contract under chapter 39.34 RCW with a county, city, town, fire protection district, public hospital district, or emergency medical service district to have emergency medical services provided within its boundaries.

Territory located in the same county as an urban emergency medical service district that is annexed by the city or town must automatically be annexed to the urban emergency medical service district.

[ 1994 c 79 s 1.]

NOTES:

Levy for emergency medical care and services: RCW 84.52.069.